Hawaii statutes.
[§342J-34] Standards for treatment,
storage, or disposal facilities. The director may establish by rules
standards applicable to owners and operators of facilities for treatment,
storage, or disposal of hazardous waste, identified or listed under this chapter,
including but not limited to, requirements regarding:

(1) Obtaining an identification number;

(2) Inspection, monitoring, submitting reports, and
recordkeeping practices;

(3) Using the manifest properly;

(4) Designing, constructing, and locating of
hazardous waste management facilities;

(5) Developing contingency plans to minimize
unanticipated damage from treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous waste;

(6) Maintaining and operating hazardous waste
management facilities;

(7) Determining qualifications as to ownership,
continuity of operation, training for personnel, closure and post-closure
requirements, and financial responsibility (including financial responsibility
for corrective action); and

(8) Issuing permits for hazardous waste management
facilities. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next